Utah statutes.
70A-5-103.   Scope.
(1)  This chapter applies to letters of credit and to certain rights and
obligations arising out of transactions involving letters of credit.
(2)  The statement of a rule in this chapter does not by itself require,
imply, or negate application of the same or a different rule to a situation
not provided for, or to a person not specified, in this chapter.
(3)  With the exception of this Subsection (3), Subsections (1) and (4),
Subsections 70A-5-102(9) and (10), 70A-5-106(4), and 70A-5-114(4), and except
to the extent prohibited in Section 70A-1a-302 and Subsection 70A-5-117(4),
the effect of this chapter may be varied by agreement or by a provision stated
or incorporated by reference in an undertaking.  A term in an agreement or
undertaking generally excusing liability or generally limiting remedies for
failure to perform obligations is not sufficient to vary obligations
prescribed by this chapter.
(4)  Rights and obligations of an issuer to a beneficiary or a nominated
person under a letter of credit are independent of the existence, performance,
or nonperformance of a contract or arrangement out of which the letter of
credit arises or which underlies it, including contracts or arrangements
between the issuer and the applicant and between the applicant and the
beneficiary.
